Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-4321
Sale or offer for sale; restrictions.

(1) No agricultural liming material shall be sold or offered for sale in this state unless it complies with the Agricultural Liming Materials Act or the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to the act.

(2) No agricultural liming material shall be sold or offered for sale in this state which contains toxic materials in quantities injurious to plants or animals.

Laws 1981, LB 396, § 21.